Illinois, session 104th, HB3111.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 514-8.02 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14-8.02)  (from Ch. 122, par. 14-8.02)7    Sec. 14-8.02. Identification, evaluation, and placement of 8children. 9    (a) The State Board of Education shall make rules under 10which local school boards shall determine the eligibility of 11children to receive special education. Such rules shall ensure 12that a free appropriate public education be available to all 13children with disabilities as defined in Section 14-1.02. The 14State Board of Education shall require local school districts 15to administer non-discriminatory procedures or tests to 16English learners coming from homes in which a language other 17than English is used to determine their eligibility to receive 18special education. The placement of low English proficiency 19students in special education programs and facilities shall be 20made in accordance with the test results reflecting the 21student's linguistic, cultural and special education needs. 22For purposes of determining the eligibility of children the 23State Board of Education shall include in the rules   HB3111- 2 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1definitions of "case study", "staff conference", 2"individualized educational program", and "qualified 3specialist" appropriate to each category of children with 4disabilities as defined in this Article. For purposes of 5determining the eligibility of children from homes in which a 6language other than English is used, the State Board of 7Education shall include in the rules definitions for 8"qualified bilingual specialists" and "linguistically and 9culturally appropriate individualized educational programs". 10For purposes of this Section, as well as Sections 14-8.02a, 1114-8.02b, and 14-8.02c of this Code, "parent" means a parent 12as defined in the federal Individuals with Disabilities 13Education Act (20 U.S.C. 1401(23)). 14    (b) No child shall be eligible for special education 15facilities except with a carefully completed case study fully 16reviewed by professional personnel in a multidisciplinary 17staff conference and only upon the recommendation of qualified 18specialists or a qualified bilingual specialist, if available. 19At the conclusion of the multidisciplinary staff conference, 20the parent of the child and, if the child is in the legal 21custody of the Department of Children and Family Services, the 22Department's Office of Education and Transition Services shall 23be given a copy of the multidisciplinary conference summary 24report and recommendations, which includes options considered, 25and, in the case of the parent, be informed of his or her right 26to obtain an independent educational evaluation if he or she   HB3111- 3 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1disagrees with the evaluation findings conducted or obtained 2by the school district. If the school district's evaluation is 3shown to be inappropriate, the school district shall reimburse 4the parent for the cost of the independent evaluation. The 5State Board of Education shall, with advice from the State 6Advisory Council on Education of Children with Disabilities on 7the inclusion of specific independent educational evaluators, 8prepare a list of suggested independent educational 9evaluators. The State Board of Education shall include on the 10list clinical psychologists licensed pursuant to the Clinical 11Psychologist Licensing Act. Such psychologists shall not be 12paid fees in excess of the amount that would be received by a 13school psychologist for performing the same services. The 14State Board of Education shall supply school districts with 15such list and make the list available to parents at their 16request. School districts shall make the list available to 17parents at the time they are informed of their right to obtain 18an independent educational evaluation. However, the school 19district may initiate an impartial due process hearing under 20this Section within 5 days of any written parent request for an 21independent educational evaluation to show that its evaluation 22is appropriate. If the final decision is that the evaluation 23is appropriate, the parent still has a right to an independent 24educational evaluation, but not at public expense. An 25independent educational evaluation at public expense must be 26completed within 30 days of a parent's written request unless   HB3111- 4 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1the school district initiates an impartial due process hearing 2or the parent or school district offers reasonable grounds to 3show that such 30-day time period should be extended. If the 4due process hearing decision indicates that the parent is 5entitled to an independent educational evaluation, it must be 6completed within 30 days of the decision unless the parent or 7the school district offers reasonable grounds to show that 8such 30-day period should be extended. If a parent disagrees 9with the summary report or recommendations of the 10multidisciplinary conference or the findings of any 11educational evaluation which results therefrom, the school 12district shall not proceed with a placement based upon such 13evaluation and the child shall remain in his or her regular 14classroom setting. No child shall be eligible for admission to 15a special class for children with a mental disability who are 16educable or for children with a mental disability who are 17trainable except with a psychological evaluation and 18recommendation by a school psychologist. Consent shall be 19obtained from the parent of a child before any evaluation is 20conducted. If consent is not given by the parent or if the 21parent disagrees with the findings of the evaluation, then the 22school district may initiate an impartial due process hearing 23under this Section. The school district may evaluate the child 24if that is the decision resulting from the impartial due 25process hearing and the decision is not appealed or if the 26decision is affirmed on appeal. The determination of   HB3111- 5 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1eligibility shall be made and the IEP meeting shall be 2completed within 60 school days from the date of written 3parental consent. In those instances when written parental 4consent is obtained with fewer than 60 pupil attendance days 5left in the school year, the eligibility determination shall 6be made and the IEP meeting shall be completed prior to the 7first day of the following school year. Special education and 8related services must be provided in accordance with the 9student's IEP no later than 10 school attendance days after 10notice is provided to the parents pursuant to Section 300.503 11of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations and 12implementing rules adopted by the State Board of Education. 13The appropriate program pursuant to the individualized 14educational program of students whose native tongue is a 15language other than English shall reflect the special 16education, cultural and linguistic needs. No later than 17September 1, 1993, the State Board of Education shall 18establish standards for the development, implementation and 19monitoring of appropriate bilingual special individualized 20educational programs. The State Board of Education shall 21further incorporate appropriate monitoring procedures to 22verify implementation of these standards. The district shall 23indicate to the parent, the State Board of Education, and, if 24applicable, the Department's Office of Education and 25Transition Services the nature of the services the child will 26receive for the regular school term while awaiting placement   HB3111- 6 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1in the appropriate special education class. At the child's 2initial IEP meeting and at each annual review meeting, the 3child's IEP team shall provide the child's parent or guardian 4and, if applicable, the Department's Office of Education and 5Transition Services with a written notification that informs 6the parent or guardian or the Department's Office of Education 7and Transition Services that the IEP team is required to 8consider whether the child requires assistive technology in 9order to receive free, appropriate public education. The 10notification must also include a toll-free telephone number 11and internet address for the State's assistive technology 12program. 13    If the child is deaf, hard of hearing, blind, or visually 14impaired or has an orthopedic impairment or physical 15disability and he or she might be eligible to receive services 16from the Illinois School for the Deaf, the Illinois School for 17the Visually Impaired, or the Illinois Center for 18Rehabilitation and Education-Roosevelt, the school district 19shall notify the parents, in writing, of the existence of 20these schools and the services they provide and shall make a 21reasonable effort to inform the parents of the existence of 22other, local schools that provide similar services and the 23services that these other schools provide. This notification 24shall include, without limitation, information on school 25services, school admissions criteria, and school contact 26information.  HB3111- 7 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1    In the development of the individualized education program 2for a student who has a disability on the autism spectrum 3(which includes autistic disorder, Asperger's disorder, 4pervasive developmental disorder not otherwise specified, 5childhood disintegrative disorder, and Rett Syndrome, as 6defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 7Disorders, fourth edition (DSM-IV, 2000)), the IEP team shall 8consider all of the following factors:9        (1) The verbal and nonverbal communication needs of 10    the child.11        (2) The need to develop social interaction skills and 12    proficiencies.13        (3) The needs resulting from the child's unusual 14    responses to sensory experiences.15        (4) The needs resulting from resistance to 16    environmental change or change in daily routines.17        (5) The needs resulting from engagement in repetitive 18    activities and stereotyped movements.19        (6) The need for any positive behavioral 20    interventions, strategies, and supports to address any 21    behavioral difficulties resulting from autism spectrum 22    disorder.23        (7) Other needs resulting from the child's disability 24    that impact progress in the general curriculum, including 25    social and emotional development.26Public Act 95-257 does not create any new entitlement to a   HB3111- 8 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1service, program, or benefit, but must not affect any 2entitlement to a service, program, or benefit created by any 3other law. 4    Beginning no later than the first annual review meeting 5after the child turns 13 years of age, the IEP team shall 6determine at each annual review meeting whether it would be 7appropriate for the child to participate in IEP meetings with 8the child's IEP team. 9    If the student may be eligible to participate in the 10Home-Based Support Services Program for Adults with Mental 11Disabilities authorized under the Developmental Disability and 12Mental Disability Services Act upon becoming an adult, the 13student's individualized education program shall include plans 14for (i) determining the student's eligibility for those 15home-based services, (ii) enrolling the student in the program 16of home-based services, and (iii) developing a plan for the 17student's most effective use of the home-based services after 18the student becomes an adult and no longer receives special 19educational services under this Article. The plans developed 20under this paragraph shall include specific actions to be 21taken by specified individuals, agencies, or officials.22    (c) In the development of the individualized education 23program for a student who is functionally blind, it shall be 24presumed that proficiency in Braille reading and writing is 25essential for the student's satisfactory educational progress. 26For purposes of this subsection, the State Board of Education   HB3111- 9 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1shall determine the criteria for a student to be classified as 2functionally blind. Students who are not currently identified 3as functionally blind who are also entitled to Braille 4instruction include: (i) those whose vision loss is so severe 5that they are unable to read and write at a level comparable to 6their peers solely through the use of vision, and (ii) those 7who show evidence of progressive vision loss that may result 8in functional blindness. Each student who is functionally 9blind shall be entitled to Braille reading and writing 10instruction that is sufficient to enable the student to 11communicate with the same level of proficiency as other 12students of comparable ability. Instruction should be provided 13to the extent that the student is physically and cognitively 14able to use Braille. Braille instruction may be used in 15combination with other special education services appropriate 16to the student's educational needs. The assessment of each 17student who is functionally blind for the purpose of 18developing the student's individualized education program 19shall include documentation of the student's strengths and 20weaknesses in Braille skills. Each person assisting in the 21development of the individualized education program for a 22student who is functionally blind shall receive information 23describing the benefits of Braille instruction. The 24individualized education program for each student who is 25functionally blind shall specify the appropriate learning 26medium or media based on the assessment report.  HB3111- 10 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1    (d) To the maximum extent appropriate, the placement shall 2provide the child with the opportunity to be educated with 3children who do not have a disability; provided that children 4with disabilities who are recommended to be placed into 5regular education classrooms are provided with supplementary 6services to assist the children with disabilities to benefit 7from the regular classroom instruction and are included on the 8teacher's regular education class register. Subject to the 9limitation of the preceding sentence, placement in special 10classes, separate schools or other removal of the child with a 11disability from the regular educational environment shall 12occur only when the nature of the severity of the disability is 13such that education in the regular classes with the use of 14supplementary aids and services cannot be achieved 15satisfactorily. The placement of English learners with 16disabilities shall be in non-restrictive environments which 17provide for integration with peers who do not have 18disabilities in bilingual classrooms. Annually, each January, 19school districts shall report data on students from 20non-English speaking backgrounds receiving special education 21and related services in public and private facilities as 22prescribed in Section 2-3.30. If there is a disagreement 23between parties involved regarding the special education 24placement of any child, either in-state or out-of-state, the 25placement is subject to impartial due process procedures 26described in Article 10 of the Rules and Regulations to Govern   HB3111- 11 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1the Administration and Operation of Special Education.2    (e) No child who comes from a home in which a language 3other than English is the principal language used may be 4assigned to any class or program under this Article until he 5has been given, in the principal language used by the child and 6used in his home, tests reasonably related to his cultural 7environment. All testing and evaluation materials and 8procedures utilized for evaluation and placement shall not be 9linguistically, racially or culturally discriminatory.10    (f) Nothing in this Article shall be construed to require 11any child to undergo any physical examination or medical 12treatment whose parents object thereto on the grounds that 13such examination or treatment conflicts with his religious 14beliefs.15    (g) School boards or their designee shall provide to the 16parents of a child or, if applicable, the Department of 17Children and Family Services' Office of Education and 18Transition Services prior written notice of any decision (a) 19proposing to initiate or change, or (b) refusing to initiate 20or change, the identification, evaluation, or educational 21placement of the child or the provision of a free appropriate 22public education to their child, and the reasons therefor. For 23a parent, such written notification shall also inform the 24parent of the opportunity to present complaints with respect 25to any matter relating to the educational placement of the 26student, or the provision of a free appropriate public   HB3111- 12 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1education and to have an impartial due process hearing on the 2complaint. The notice shall inform the parents in the parents' 3native language, unless it is clearly not feasible to do so, of 4their rights and all procedures available pursuant to this Act 5and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 6Improvement Act of 2004 (Public Law 108-446); it shall be the 7responsibility of the State Superintendent to develop uniform 8notices setting forth the procedures available under this Act 9and the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 10Improvement Act of 2004 (Public Law 108-446) to be used by all 11school boards. The notice shall also inform the parents of the 12availability upon request of a list of free or low-cost legal 13and other relevant services available locally to assist 14parents in initiating an impartial due process hearing. The 15State Superintendent shall revise the uniform notices required 16by this subsection (g) to reflect current law and procedures 17at least once every 2 years. Any parent who is deaf or does not 18normally communicate using spoken English and who participates 19in a meeting with a representative of a local educational 20agency for the purposes of developing an individualized 21educational program or attends a multidisciplinary conference 22shall be entitled to the services of an interpreter. The State 23Board of Education must adopt rules to establish the criteria, 24standards, and competencies for a bilingual language 25interpreter who attends an individualized education program 26meeting under this subsection to assist a parent who has   HB3111- 13 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1limited English proficiency. 2    (g-5) For purposes of this subsection (g-5), "qualified 3professional" means an individual who holds credentials to 4evaluate the child in the domain or domains for which an 5evaluation is sought or an intern working under the direct 6supervision of a qualified professional, including a master's 7or doctoral degree candidate.8    To ensure that a parent can participate fully and 9effectively with school personnel in the development of 10appropriate educational and related services for his or her 11child, the parent, an independent educational evaluator, or a 12qualified professional retained by or on behalf of a parent or 13child must be afforded reasonable access to educational 14facilities, personnel, classrooms, and buildings and to the 15child as provided in this subsection (g-5). The requirements 16of this subsection (g-5) apply to any public school facility, 17building, or program and to any facility, building, or program 18supported in whole or in part by public funds. Prior to 19visiting a school, school building, or school facility, the 20parent, independent educational evaluator, or qualified 21professional may be required by the school district to inform 22the building principal or supervisor in writing of the 23proposed visit, the purpose of the visit, and the approximate 24duration of the visit. The visitor and the school district 25shall arrange the visit or visits at times that are mutually 26agreeable. Visitors shall comply with school safety, security,   HB3111- 14 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1and visitation policies at all times. School district 2visitation policies must not conflict with this subsection 3(g-5). Visitors shall be required to comply with the 4requirements of applicable privacy laws, including those laws 5protecting the confidentiality of education records such as 6the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act and the 7Illinois School Student Records Act. The visitor shall not 8disrupt the educational process.9        (1) A parent must be afforded reasonable access of 10    sufficient duration and scope for the purpose of observing 11    his or her child in the child's current educational 12    placement, services, or program or for the purpose of 13    visiting an educational placement or program proposed for 14    the child.15        (2) An independent educational evaluator or a 16    qualified professional retained by or on behalf of a 17    parent or child must be afforded reasonable access of 18    sufficient duration and scope for the purpose of 19    conducting an evaluation of the child, the child's 20    performance, the child's current educational program, 21    placement, services, or environment, or any educational 22    program, placement, services, or environment proposed for 23    the child, including interviews of educational personnel, 24    child observations, assessments, tests or assessments of 25    the child's educational program, services, or placement or 26    of any proposed educational program, services, or   HB3111- 15 -LRB104 08414 LNS 18465 b1    placement. If one or more interviews of school personnel 2    are part of the evaluation, the interviews must be 3    conducted at a mutually agreed-upon time, date, and place 4    that do not interfere with the school employee's school 5    duties. The school district may limit interviews to 6    personnel having information relevant to the child's 7    current educational services, program, or placement or to 8    a proposed educational service, program, or placement.9    (h) In the development of the individualized education 10program or federal Section 504 plan for a student, if the 11student needs extra accommodation during emergencies, 12including natural disasters or an active shooter situation, 13then that accommodation shall be taken into account when 14developing the student's individualized education program or 15federal Section 504 plan. 16(Source: P.A. 102-199, eff. 7-1-22; 102-264, eff. 8-6-21; 17102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1072, eff. 186-10-22; 103-197, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)